Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1557.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 32, chapter 32, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 32-3228.01, to read: START_STATUTE32-3228.01. Informed consent; exception; definition A. Before performing any medical intervention on a patient, A health professional shall obtain a signed informed consent, which shall be retained in the patient's medical record. B. The requirements of subsection a of this section do not apply when a patient is receiving emergency medical care. C. For the purposes of this section, "medical intervention" means a medical procedure, treatment, device, drug, injection, medication or medical action taken to diagnose, prevent or cure a disease or alter the health or biological function of a person. END_STATUTE